dictsource/ny_rules
// ***************************************************************************/ 
// *   Chichewa Language ny ny_rules                                         *
// *   Original Author Andy Vladescu, 2024                                   *
// *   Contact info: andyvladescu770@gmail.com                               *
// ***************************************************************************/
// *   This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify  *
// *   it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by  *
// *   the Free Software Foundation; either version 3 of the License, or     *
// *   (at your option) any later version.                                   *
// *                                                                         *
// *   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,       *
// *   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of        *
// *   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the         *
// *   GNU General Public License for more details.                          *
// *                                                                         *
// *   You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License     *
// *   along with this program; if not, see:                                 *
// *               <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.                           *
// ***************************************************************************/


// This file is UTF-8 encoded

.group a
   a       a

.group b
   b       b
   bw      bw
   bz      bZ;

.group c
   c       tS         // for Chinyanja
   ch      tS

.group d
   d       d
   dw      dw
   dy      d;
   dz      dz
   dzw     dzw

.group e
   e       e

.group f
   f       f
   fw      fw
   fy      fj

.group g
   g       g
   gw      gw

.group h
   h       h

.group i
   i       i

.group j
   j       J

.group k
   k       k
   kh      k#
   khw     kwh
   kw      kw

.group l
   l       l.
   lw      l.w

.group m
   m       m
   m'      m?      // used in Chinyanja
   _)  mb      m-b
   mb      mb
   _)  mbw     m-bw
   mbw     mbw
   _)  mbz     m-bz;
   mbz     mbz;
   _)  mf      m-f
   mf      mf
   _) mph     m-p#
   mph     mp#
   _) mphw    m-p#wh
   mphw    mp#wh
   _) mps     m-pS;
   mps     mpS;
   _) mv      m-v
   mv      mv
   mw      mw
   my      mj

.group n
   n       n
   _) nd      n-d
   nd      nd
   _) ndw     n-dw
   nd      ndw
   _) ndy     n-d;
   ndy        nd;
   _) ndz     n-dz
   ndz        ndz
   _) ng      N-g
   ng         Ng
   ng'     N
   ng'w    Nw
   _) ngw     N-gw
   ngw        Ngw
   _) nj      n-J
   nj         nJ
   _) nkh     N-k#
   nkh     Nk#
   _) nkhw    N-k#w
   nkhw       Nk#w
   _) ns      n-s
   ns      ns
   _) nsw     n-sw
   nsw     nsw
   _) ntch    n-tS
   ntch    ntS
   _) nth     n-t#
   nth     nt#
   _) nthw    n-twh
   nthw    ntwh
   _) nthy    n-t;h
   nthy    nt;h
   ny      n^
   _) nz      n-z
   nz      nz
   _) nzw     n-zw
   nzw     nzw

.group o
   o       O

.group p
   p       p
   ph      p#
   phw     p#wh
   ps      pS;
   pw      pw
   py      pj

.group r
   r       r.
   rw      r.w

.group s
   s       s
   sh      S
   sw      sw

.group t
   t       t
   tch     tS#
   th      t#
   ts      ts
   tsw     tsw
   tw      tw
   thw     twh
   ty      t;
   tyh     t;h

.group u
   u       u

.group v
   v       v
   vw      vw
   vy      vj

.group w
   w       w

.group ŵ
   ŵ       B

.group y
   y       j

.group z
   z       z
   zw      zw
   zy      Z


.group
        $        dola
        %        per.esenti

        *        n^en^ezi
    *)  * (*
        **
   **)  * (_     _::
